Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 9. Organic Change.

Sec. 06.26.650.
General provisions for conversions, mergers, and consolidations.

A national bank whose main office is located in the state or a state bank whose main office is located in the state may convert to a trust company or merge or consolidate with a trust company, and a trust company may merge or consolidate with another trust company, if the conversion, merger, or consolidation is consistent with federal and state law and approved by the department. The requirements of AS

06.26.650

—

06.26.670

are in addition to the merger and consolidation requirements of AS 10.06.

Before merger or consolidation under (a) of this section, a trust company shall file with the department a merger or consolidation application and other information and reports that the department requires under AS

06.26.660

.

The department, in the exercise of its power to approve or disapprove applications for merger or consolidation under (a) of this section, shall act in the interests of promoting and maintaining a sound trust company system, promoting the security of deposits and customers, preserving of the liquid position of trust companies, and preventing injurious credit expansions and contractions.

A trust company converting to or merging or consolidating with a national bank shall submit to the department a copy of any application to the United States Comptroller of the Currency for a national bank charter or any other application to the United States Comptroller of the Currency to convert, merge, or consolidate when the applications are forwarded to the United States Comptroller of the Currency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For organic change, see 3 AAC 4, art. 6.

Sec. 06.26.660.
Merger or consolidation.

To merge or consolidate under AS

06.26.650

, the merging persons shall file with the department the original articles of merger or consolidation, a number of copies of the articles of merger or consolidation equal to the number of trust companies involved in the merger or consolidation, and an application in the form required by the department. The department may require the submission of additional information it considers necessary to make an informed decision.

The department may approve a merger or a consolidation if

the surviving or new trust company will be solvent and have adequate capitalization for its operations and location;

the surviving or new trust company has in all respects complied with the statutes and regulations governing the organization of a trust company in this state;

all obligations and liabilities of each trust company that is a party to the merger or consolidation have been properly discharged or otherwise lawfully assumed or retained by a trust company or other fiduciary;

a surviving or new trust company is not authorized to act as a fiduciary under this chapter, will not act as a fiduciary, and has otherwise complied with the laws of this state;

the surviving or new trust company satisfies the provisions in AS

06.26.090

that the department determines apply to the trust company; and

all conditions imposed by the department have been satisfied.

If the department approves the merger or consolidation and finds that all investigative expenses incurred by the department and all required filing fees have been paid, the department shall issue a certificate of merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For organic change, see 3 AAC 4, art. 6.

Sec. 06.26.670.
Rights of dissenters.

In addition to the dissenter’s rights under AS 10.06 for a merger or consolidation, if a shareholder of a trust company objects to a conversion of the trust company, the dissenting shareholder’s rights shall be exercised under and governed by AS

10.06.574

—

10.06.582

as if the conversion were a merger.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.680.
Authority to purchase assets of another trust company.

A trust company with the prior written approval of the department may purchase all or substantially all of the assets of another trust company, including the right to control accounts established with the trust accounts. Except as otherwise expressly provided by another statute, the purchase by a trust company of all or part of the assets of another trust company does not make the purchasing trust company responsible for a liability or obligation of the selling trust company that the purchasing trust company does not expressly assume. Except as otherwise provided by statute, AS

06.26.450

—

06.26.480

do not govern or prohibit the purchase by a trust company of all or part of the assets of a person who is not a trust company or an exempt private trust company.

To purchase assets under (a) of this section, a trust company shall file with the department an application in the form required by the department. The department shall investigate the condition of the purchaser and seller and may require the submission of additional information it considers necessary to make an informed decision. The department shall approve the purchase if

the purchasing trust company will be solvent after the purchase and have sufficient capitalization for its operations and location;

the purchasing trust company has complied with all applicable statutes and regulations in this state;

all fiduciary obligations and liabilities of the purchasing trust company and selling trust company have been properly discharged or otherwise lawfully assumed by the purchasing trust company;

all conditions imposed by the department have been satisfied or otherwise resolved; and

all expenses incurred by the department and all required fees have been paid.

A purchase under this section is effective on the date the department approves the purchase unless the purchase agreement provides for, and the department consents to, a different effective date.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For organic change, see 3 AAC 4, art. 6.

Sec. 06.26.690.
Authority to act as disbursing agent.

A purchasing trust company may hold the purchase price and any additional money or other assets delivered to it by the selling trust company in trust for the selling trust company and may act as an agent of the selling trust company in disbursing the money or other assets by paying the creditors of the selling trust company. If the purchasing trust company acts under a written contract of agency approved by the department that specifically names each creditor and the amount to be paid each creditor, and if the agency is limited to the purely ministerial act of paying creditors the amounts due them as determined by the selling trust company and reflected in the contract of agency and does not involve discretionary duties or authority other than the identification of the creditors named, the purchasing trust company

may rely on the contract of agency and the instructions included in it; and

is not responsible for

an error made by the selling trust company when determining its liabilities, the creditors to whom the liabilities are due, or the amounts due to the creditors; or

a preference that results from the payments made under the contract of agency and the instructions included in the contract.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.700.
Liquidation of selling trust company.

If a selling trust company is at any time after the sale of assets voluntarily or involuntarily closed for liquidation by a state or federal regulatory agency, the purchasing trust company shall pay to the receiver of the selling trust company the balance of the money or other assets held by the purchasing trust company in trust for the selling trust company and not yet paid to the creditors of the selling trust company. Without further action, the purchasing trust company is then discharged of all responsibilities to the selling trust company and the selling trust company’s receiver, creditors, and shareholders.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.710.
Payment to creditors.

A purchasing trust company may pay a creditor of the selling trust company the amount to be paid the creditor under the terms of the contract of agency entered into under AS

06.26.690

by opening an agency account in the name of the creditor, crediting the account with the amount to be paid the creditor under the terms of the agency contract, and mailing or personally delivering a duplicate of the written evidence of the credit to the creditor at the creditor’s address shown in the records of the selling trust company. With regard to the creditor, the purchasing trust company is an agent of the selling trust company only to the extent of the credit reflected by the written evidence of the credit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.720.
Sale of assets.

The board of a trust company, with the department’s approval, may cause a trust company to sell all or substantially all of its assets, including the right to control accounts established with the trust company for trust assets, without shareholder approval if the department finds

the interests of the trust company’s creditors and depositors and other customers are not jeopardized because of an unsafe or unsound condition of the trust company;

the sale is in the best interest of the trust company’s creditors and depositors and other customers; and

the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor approves the transaction unless the deposits of the trust company are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor.

A sale under this section must include an assumption and promise by the purchaser to pay or otherwise discharge

all of the trust company’s liabilities to customers;

all of the trust company’s liabilities for the salaries of the trust company’s employees incurred before the date of the sale;

the obligations incurred by the department arising out of the supervision or sale of the trust company; and

the fees and any other payment due to the department under this chapter and assessments due to the department under AS

06.01.010

.

This section does not limit the incidental power of a trust company to buy and sell assets in the ordinary course of its operations.

The sale by a trust company of all or substantially all of its assets with shareholder approval is considered a voluntary dissolution and liquidation and is governed by AS

06.26.730

—

06.26.800

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For organic change, see 3 AAC 4, art. 6.